Wisconsin, session 2025, SB766.
do enact as follows:SB766,14Section 1. 114.045 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 114.045 (1) (a).SB766,25Section 2. 114.045 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB766,2,26114.045 (1) (b) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2. or 3., no person may operate 1a drone, as defined in s. 941.292 (1), at an altitude of less than 300 feet, over or 2within 500 feet of a parcel on which of any of the following facilities are located:SB766,2,43a. A water reclamation facility or a building designed for the purpose of water 4reclamation conveyance management.SB766,2,75b. A gas or electric power plant, generating station, electric substation, 6natural gas gate station, or storage facility or a building designed for the purpose of 7gas or electric power management.SB766,2,108c. A telecommunications carrier plant, equipment used to furnish 9telecommunications services, or a building designed for the purpose of 10telecommunications management.SB766,2,1211d. A public water system facility or a building designed for the purpose of 12public water system management.SB766,2,14132. Subdivision 1. does not prohibit the operation of a drone at the direction of 14any of the following for official business:SB766,2,1615a. The owner or operator of the facility for the purpose of monitoring, 16inspecting, operating, or maintaining the facility.SB766,2,1817b. A county, city, village, or town in which the parcel is located in any area 18under its jurisdiction.SB766,2,21193. Subdivision 1. does not prohibit the operation of a drone for a commercial 20purpose if the done is operated in compliance with federal aviation administration 21regulations, authorizations, or exemptions.SB766,322Section 3. 114.045 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 114.045 (3) (a) and 23amended to read:SB766,3,424114.045 (3) (a) A law enforcement officer investigating an alleged violation of 1sub. (1) (a) shall seize and transfer to the department of corrections or authority in 2charge of the correctional institution any photograph, motion picture, other visual 3representation, or data that represents a visual image that was created or recorded 4by a drone during an alleged violation of sub. (1) (a).SB766,45Section 4. 114.045 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB766,3,96114.045 (3) (b) A law enforcement officer investigating an alleged violation of 7sub. (1) (b) shall seize and do all of the following with any photograph, motion 8picture, or other visual representation, or data that represents a visual image that 9was created or recorded by a drone during an alleged violation of sub. (1) (b):SB766,3,12101. Transfer the materials to the law enforcement agency that has primary 11responsibility for providing police protective services in the city, village, or town in 12which the violation occurred.SB766,3,15132. Upon completion of any enforcement proceeding related to an alleged 14violation of sub. (1) (b), provide copies of the materials to each city, village, town, or 15county in which the violation occurred.SB766,3,1616